District of Columbia statutes.
49-212

Distinctive uniforms.

Any organization of the active militia may, with the approval of the Commanding General, and at its own expense, adopt any other uniform than that issued to it; but such uniform shall not be worn when such organization is on duty under the orders of the Commanding General except by his permission.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328, § 37
renumbered Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 40
1981 Ed., § 39-212.
1973 Ed., § 39-512.